Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1707.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of public safety; artificial intelligence; border security A. The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of public safety for artificial intelligence relating to border security. B. The department of public safety may distribute monies appropriated in subsection A of this section to local law enforcement agencies to enforce border security by using artificial intelligence.